Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 80. Pharmacists and Pharmacies.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 2, SSSLA 2017 (HB 159), which amended provisions in this chapter relating to opioid prescription and registration with the controlled substance prescription database, see 2017 House Journal 408 — 410.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Pharmacists employed by tribal health programs generally do not need to be licensed in Alaska as long as they are licensed in another state, under the provisions of 25 U.S.C. 450 et seq., known as “Section 221”. This provision expressly overrides state licensing requirements for a pharmacist who qualifies by being licensed in another state. The State Board may require proof of out-of-state licensure and tribal health program employment status, and retains disciplinary authority over tribal health program pharmacists who are licensed in Alaska. Also, federally certified community health aides do not have to obtain pharmacist or pharmacy technician license even if they are performing pharmacy-related functions as long as they are within their scope of practice. 25 U.S.C. § 1616l implicitly preempts state law in that regard. See 2005 Inf. Op. Att’y Gen. (Sept. 8; 663-05-0152). 2012 Op. Alaska Att’y Gen. (April 17).

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Drugs and Controlled Substances, §§ 81-93.

28 C.J.S. Supp., Drugs and Narcotics, §§ 71-75, 103-112.

Civil liability of pharmacist or druggists for failure to warn of potential drug interactions in use of prescription drug, 79 ALR5th 409.